District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

13-303

Service or execution on Sunday.

Repealed.

June 18, 1991, D.C. Law 9-5, § 3(c), 38 DCR 2717
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-39, § 3(c), 38 DCR 4970

History

1981 Ed., § 13-303.

Prior Codifications